Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-267
Subpoena; notice of subsequent hearing.

(1) As provided under sections 43-263 to 43-266, subpoenas may be issued requiring the appearance of any other person whose presence, in the opinion of the judge, is necessary.

(2) Notice of the time, date, place, and purpose of any juvenile court hearing subsequent to the initial hearing, for which a summons or notice has been served or waived, shall be given to all parties either in court, by mail, or in such other manner as the court may direct.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 23.